Massachusetts, session 194th, S319.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 7 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 63. (a) There shall be established an After School and Out-of-School Time
Opportunity Fund. The program shall be administered by the department of elementary and
secondary education. A qualified program eligible for funding is any out-of-school time program
that serves school age children and youth and is licensed by the department of early education
and care, or is license-exempt.
(b) The purpose of the fund shall be to support the establishment of and increase access to
and the quality of afterschool and out of school time programs. The fund shall consist of all
moneys received by the commonwealth equal to 3 percent of the receipts of the sales price of
purchases received by all marijuana retailers as provided for in chapter 64N as excises paid to the
of 2

commissioner of revenue. Such amounts in the fund shall be administered by the department of
elementary and secondary education.
(c) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the
provisions of this section.
of 2